New York, session 2025-2026, S1005.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative findings and intent. The Legislature affirms 2 the finding of the U.S. Surgeon General's Advisory on Protecting Youth 3 Mental Health that the COVID-19 pandemic has dramatically altered young 4 peoples' experiences at home, at school, and in the community and has 5 exacerbated the unprecedented stresses young people face. The Legisla- 6 ture also finds that there exists an obligation to act to assist our 7 children and their families in this moment of need. The Legislature 8 intends, then, to provide actionable solutions for young people and 9 their families in support of the mental health of children, adolescents, 10 and young adults. 11 § 2. Section 5.05 of the mental hygiene law is amended by adding a new 12 subdivision (f) to read as follows: 13 (f) The commissioners of the office of mental health and the office of 14 addiction services and supports shall establish a youth mental tele- 15 health services program to facilitate access to mental health services, 16 including substance use disorder services, for youth to respond to iden- 17 tified mental health needs, including those needs that may have resulted 18 from the COVID-19 pandemic, and for youth or families that may not have 19 access to mental health professionals in-person. Such program shall 20 provide up to five mental telehealth services annually at no cost to the 21 individual, for acute crisis response, mental health assessment, or 22 initiation of care to reduce barriers and facilitate engagement in long- 23 term care. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02209-01-5 S. 1005 2 1 As soon as practicable, but no later than August first, two thousand 2 twenty-five, the offices shall enter into an agreement with a vendor to 3 create, or use an existing, website or web-based application, as a 4 portal available to youth and providers to facilitate the program. Such 5 vendor shall be determined through a competitive bidding process. 6 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 7 it shall have become a law.